North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Article 3A. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 59-84.1.
Partnership to comply with
Assumed Business Name Act; income taxation.

Every partnership other than a limited partnership shall comply with, and be subject to, the provisions of Articles 14A and 15 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes in all cases in which the Articles are applicable.

A partnership, including a registered limited liability partnership and a foreign limited liability partnership, and a partner of one of these partnerships are subject to taxation under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes in accordance with their classification for federal income tax purposes. Accordingly, if any such partnership is classified for federal income tax purposes as a C corporation as defined in G.S. 105-131(b)(2) or an S corporation as defined in G.S. 105-131(b)(8), the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes to the same extent as a C corporation or an S corporation, as the case may be, and its shareholders. If any such partnership is classified for federal income tax purposes as a partnership, the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes accordingly. If any such partnership is classified for federal income tax purposes as other than a corporation or a partnership, the partnership and its partners are subject to tax under Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes in a manner consistent with that classification. This section does not require a partnership, including any registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this State, to obtain an administrative ruling from the Internal Revenue Service on its classification under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

1951, c. 381, s. 9; 1993, c. 354, s. 5; 2001-387, s. 117; 2016-100, s. 7.